Maine, session 132, LD1327.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §13803 is enacted to read:
§13803. Student teaching; compensation
1. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise indicates,
the following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Cooperating teacher" means a teacher assigned to supervise, oversee or mentor a
student teacher.
B. "Educator preparation program" has the same meaning as in section 13001-A,
subsection 9.
C. "Student teacher" means a student enrolled in an educator preparation program at a
postsecondary educational institution in the State who is gaining classroom experience
with direct student engagement, including but not limited to tutoring, planning and
implementing lesson plans and otherwise directly interacting with students on an
individual basis or in a group setting under the supervision of a cooperating teacher.
"Student teacher" does not include a student enrolled in an educator preparation
program at a postsecondary educational institution in the State who is completing
activities that are composed solely of observing classrooms or students.
2. Compensation. A postsecondary educational institution that operates an educator
preparation program in the State shall compensate participants in accordance with this
subsection.
A. A student teacher must be compensated with a stipend of a minimum of $500 per
week for the duration of the student teaching assignment and must be reimbursed for
travel or mileage to and from their assigned school.
B. A cooperating teacher must be compensated with a stipend of a minimum of $500
per month for each month spent supervising, overseeing or mentoring a student teacher.
3. Substitute teaching. If a student teacher or cooperating teacher serves as a
substitute teacher for a partial or full school day, the school administrative unit shall
compensate the student teacher or cooperating teacher with the per diem substitute teacher
rate for that day in addition to the stipends described in subsection 2.
4. Repayment. If a student teacher that receives a stipend described in subsection 2,
paragraph A becomes employed as a teacher at a private school or a school outside of the
State upon graduation, the student teacher shall reimburse the State for the total amount the
student teacher received as a student teaching stipend.
5. Funding. The State shall appropriate, on an annual basis, from the General Fund
sufficient funding to the University of Maine System for the compensation described in
subsection 2. The University of Maine System shall disburse funds directly to student
teachers and cooperating teachers in accordance with subsection 2.